Utah statutes.
58-37c-5.   Responsibility of Department of Commerce -- Delegation to the Division of Occupational and Professional Licensing -- Rulemaking authority of the division.

(1)  Responsibility for the enforcement of the licensing and reporting provisions of this chapter shall be with the Department of Commerce.

(2)  The executive director shall delegate specific responsibility within the department to the Division of Occupational and Professional Licensing.

(3)  The division shall make, adopt, amend, and repeal rules necessary for the proper administration and enforcement of this chapter.

